District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “4111 Kansas Avenue NW Timeline Extension and Tax Forgiveness Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) Notwithstanding D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.03(b), SOME, Inc., the owner
of the real property located at 4111 Kansas Avenue, NW, and known for tax and assessment
purposes as Lots 2001 through 2045 in Square 2910 (“Property”), shall have 48 months
following the date of acquisition of the Property to meet the recertification requirements.
(b) All real property and recordation taxes assessed with respect to the Property
beginning on May 21, 2022, through the time frame outlined in subsection (a) of this section,
shall be forgiven and refunded.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.